Wyoming, session 2026, HB0150.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-12-103(a) is amended to read:

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
9-12-103. Wyoming business council; creation;
composition; compensation; termination; meetings; surety
bonds; fiscal control.

(a) There is created the Wyoming business council.
The council is a body corporate operating as a state
instrumentality operated solely for the public benefit. As
such it shall have, and is hereby vested with, the powers
and duties conferred in this chapter. Beginning March 1,
2022, it shall be governed by a board of directors
consisting of thirteen (13) voting directors, appointed by
the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The
governor shall be a member and cochairman of the board, but
shall not vote. The appointed directors shall have
demonstrated leadership and business expertise. An equal
number of directors shall be appointed to initial terms of
one (1), two (2) and three (3) years. Thereafter, directors
shall serve for terms of three (3) years. No appointed
director shall serve more than two (2) successive three (3)
year terms. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall appoint
a successor in accordance with W.S. 28-12-101. The governor
may remove any board member he appoints for cause and shall
remove any director who fails to attend three (3)
HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
consecutive regular meetings of the council. No appointed
council member shall send a designee to attend a council
meeting nor vote by proxy. The board shall select one (1)
of its members to act as cochairman of the board. The
board shall retain a chief executive officer. The chief
executive officer serves at the pleasure of the board. All
of the appointed directors shall be appointed at large and
at least twelve (12) of the appointed directors shall be
residents of Wyoming. In addition to the appointed voting
members, there shall be one (1) ex officio nonvoting member
appointed by the president of the senate and one (1) ex
officio nonvoting member appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives.

Section 2.

(a) There is created the Wyoming business council
strategic advisory task force to consist of the following
members:

(i) The governor or the governor's designee;

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
(ii) Two (2) members of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. One (1) member appointed under this
paragraph shall be designated by the speaker of the house
as cochairman of the task force;

(iii) Two (2) members of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate. One (1) member appointed
under this paragraph shall be designated by the president
of the senate as cochairman of the task force;

(iv) One (1) member of the Wyoming business
council board of directors;

(v) One (1) member representing business in
Wyoming, recommended by a statewide organization
representing Wyoming business and appointed by the
governor;

(vi) One (1) member representing manufacturing
business in Wyoming, appointed by the governor;

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
(vii) One (1) member representing agriculture
business in Wyoming, appointed by the governor;

(viii) One (1) member representing the oil, gas
or mineral industry, appointed by the governor;

(ix) One (1) member representing the tourism
industry, appointed by the governor;

(x) Two (2) members representing local economic
development organizations in Wyoming, appointed by the
governor;

(xi) One (1) member who is an elected official
of a city or town in Wyoming, recommended by a statewide
organization representing municipalities in Wyoming and
appointed by the governor;

(xii) One (1) member who is an elected official
of a county in Wyoming, recommended by a statewide
organization representing counties in Wyoming and appointed
by the governor.

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
(b) The task force shall be staffed by the
legislative service office.

(c) The task force shall meet not less than three (3)
times during the work of the task force.

(d) Legislative members of the task force shall
receive salary, per diem and mileage as provided by W.S.
28-5-101. Members of the task force who are not members of
the legislature or state employees shall receive per diem
and mileage as provided by W.S. 28-5-101.

(e) The task force shall:

(i) Evaluate the Wyoming business council and
its programs, duties and functions, including those
programs, duties and functions assumed or delegated to the
Wyoming business council that are not specified in the
Wyoming Economic Development Act;

(ii) Review economic development initiatives
from similar states to Wyoming to inform and develop
HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
proposed recommendations and possible policy changes for
the Wyoming business council;

(iii) Review the information reported and
submitted by the Wyoming business council under section 3
of this act;

(iv) Consider and develop a proposed strategic
direction for the Wyoming business council that represents
the needs of the Wyoming business community;

(v) Evaluate which programs, duties and
functions of the Wyoming business council should be
retained, modified, privatized, transferred or eliminated;

(vi) Consider and develop recommended
improvements for the operations of the Wyoming business
council, including how the Wyoming business council
interacts with and involves the Wyoming business community;

(vii) Develop recommendations for a clear method
for communicating and reporting the work and operations of
the Wyoming business council to the governor's office and
HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
the joint minerals, business and economic development
interim committee;

(viii) Evaluate other community infrastructure
development programs and opportunities that may be
available through consensus block grant funding, mineral
royalty grants or other funding mechanisms;

(ix) Consider and make recommendations for the
incorporation and funding of regional comprehensive
economic development strategies through the Wyoming
business council in coordination with local governments and
economic development organizations;

(x) Consider and make a recommendation to the
legislature about the creation of a select economic
development committee;

(xi) Consider and develop proposed legislation
to implement any recommendations or proposals developed
through the task force's work under this subsection.

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
(f) Not later than October 1, 2026, the task force
shall:

(i) Report its findings and recommendations for
the Wyoming business council to the governor and the joint
minerals, business and economic development interim
committee;

(ii) Forward any proposed legislation for the
2027 general session to the joint minerals, business and
economic development interim committee or to another
applicable committee.

(g) The task force may request the assistance of any
state agency or other entity in completing its work. Upon
receiving a request under this subsection, each agency or
entity shall provide assistance to the task force as
requested.

(h) The task force created under this section shall
terminate on December 31, 2026.

Section 3.
HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481

(a) On the effective date of this act, the Wyoming
business council shall not take any action that expands any
program, duty or function of the Wyoming business council
and shall not assume any new program, duty or function
until July 1, 2027, unless otherwise required by law.

(b) Not later than April 30, 2026, the Wyoming
business council shall report to the joint minerals,
business and economic development interim committee, the
governor, the state budget department and the Wyoming
energy authority on all of the following:

(i) The total amount of grant funds and
financial aid obligated for disbursement as of April 30,
2026 but not disbursed;

(ii) The number of loans executed by the Wyoming
business council that are still outstanding as of April 30,
2026. In reporting information under this paragraph, the
Wyoming business council shall itemize each loan by program
and report the recipient of each outstanding loan, the
terms and conditions of each outstanding loan, the
HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
repayment schedule for each loan and the amount remaining
to be repaid for each outstanding loan;

(iii) The number of bonds executed by the
Wyoming business council before April 30, 2026 that are
still outstanding as of April 30, 2026. In reporting
information under this paragraph, the Wyoming business
council shall report each outstanding bond, the terms and
conditions of each outstanding bond and any amount
remaining to be paid or repaid for each outstanding bond;

(iv) Agreements or contracts for grants, loans,
bonds and financial aid for which the state receives or
will receive a portion or all of the funds upon a sale of
property or the project;

(v) All real and personal property owned or held
by the Wyoming business council as of April 30, 2026.
Information reported under this paragraph shall include the
program or function for which the property is owned or
held;

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
(vi) Each program and function administered or
operated by the Wyoming business council;

(vii) Each set or group of funds received or
managed by the Wyoming business council;

(viii) The return on investment for each program
operated or administered by the Wyoming business council.

Section 4.

(a) There is appropriated twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative
service office for purposes of providing salary, per diem
and mileage to the legislative members of the task force
created under section 2 of this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning with the effective date
of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.

HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
(b) There is appropriated forty thousand dollars
($40,000.00) from the general fund to the office of the
governor for purposes of providing per diem and mileage to
nonlegislative members of the task force created under
section 2 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the standard budget of the
office of the governor for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

(c) There is appropriated seventy-five thousand
dollars ($75,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for purposes of securing expert
or consulting services associated with the evaluation and
review of the Wyoming business council specified in this
act. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning
with the effective date of this act and ending June 30,
2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
HB0150

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0481
expended for any other purpose and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028.

(d) The legislative service office and the office of
the governor may accept grants, gifts and donations to be
utilized for the purposes specified in this section.

Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0150